Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.030

Marketing orders authorized—Purposes.

Marketing orders may be made for any one or more of the following purposes:

(1) To establish plans and conduct programs for advertising and sales promotion, to maintain present markets, or to create new or larger markets for any agricultural commodity grown in the state of Washington;

(2) To provide for carrying on research studies to find more efficient methods of production, irrigation, processing, transportation, handling, and marketing of any agricultural commodity;

(3) To provide for improving standards and grades by defining, establishing, and providing labeling requirements with respect to the same;

(4) To investigate and take necessary action to prevent unfair trade practices;

(5) To provide information or communicate on matters pertaining to the production, irrigation, processing, transportation, marketing, or uses of an agricultural commodity produced in Washington state to any elected official or officer or employee of any agency;

(6) To provide marketing information and services for producers of an agricultural commodity;

(7) To provide information and services for meeting resource conservation objectives of producers of an agricultural commodity;

(8) To engage in cooperative efforts in the domestic or foreign marketing of food products of an agricultural commodity;

(9) To provide for commodity-related education and training; and

(10) To assist and cooperate with the department or any other local, state, or federal government agency in the investigation and control of exotic pests and diseases that could damage or affect trade of the affected commodity.

[ 2003 c 396 s 1; 2002 c 313 s 40; 2001 c 315 s 1; 1961 c 11 s 15.66.030. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 20, 2003]." [ 2003 c 396 s 45.]

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.